Utah statutes.
9-4-915.   Corporation moneys -- Depositing and paying out -- Power to
contract with holders of notes and bonds -- Moneys held in trust.
(1) (a)  All moneys of the corporation, except as otherwise authorized or
provided in this part, shall be deposited as soon as practicable in a separate
account or accounts in banks or trust companies organized under the laws of
the state or national banking association.
(b)  The moneys in these accounts shall be paid out on checks signed by the
president or other officers or employees of the corporation as the corporation
shall authorize.
(c)  All deposits of moneys shall, if required by the corporation, be secured
in a manner as the corporation determines to be prudent, and all banks and
trust companies are authorized to give security for the deposits.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the corporation shall
have power to contract with the holders of any of its notes or bonds as to the
custody, collection, securing, investment, and payment of any moneys of the
corporation and of any moneys held in trust or otherwise for the payment of
notes or bonds, and to carry out that contract.
(b)  Moneys held in trust or otherwise for the payment of notes or bonds or in
any way to secure notes or bonds and deposits of moneys may be secured in the
same manner as moneys of the corporation, and all banks and trust companies
are authorized to give security for the deposits.
